hu: Fosszilis megőrzés típusa: Borostyánkő zárvány; Szénfilm; Öntvény (pozitív); Lenyomat; Konkréció / gumó; Koprolit; Lenyomat; Öntőforma (negatív); Eredeti kemény részek; Permineralizált; Megkövesedett fa; Újrakristályosodott; Helyettesítődés; Nyomfosszília; Egyéb
fr: Type de conservation du fossile: Inclusion dans l'ambre; Film de carbone; Moulage (positif); Compression; Concrétion/nodule; Coprolithe; Empreinte; Moule (négatif); Parties dures d'origine; Perminéralisé; Bois pétrifié; Recristallisé; Remplacement; Trace fossile; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta ohranjanja fosilov: Vključek v jantarju; Ogljikova plast; Odlitek (pozitiv); Kompresija; Konkrecija/nodul; Koprolit; Odtis; Kalup (negativ); Prvotni trdi deli; Permineralizirano; Okamenel les; Rekristalizirano; Nadomestitev; Fosilna sled; Drugo
ru: Тип сохранности окаменелости: Инклюз в янтаре; Углеродистая пленка; Слепок (позитив); Компрессия; Конкреция / нодуль; Копролит; Отпечаток; Отпечаток (негатив); Оригинальные твердые части; Перминерализованный; Окаменелое дерево; Рекристаллизованный; Замещение; Ихнофоссилия; Другое
nl: Fossiel conserveringstype: Insluitsel in barnsteen; Koolstoffilm; Afgietsel (positief); Compressie; Concretie/nodule; Coproliet; Afdruk; Mal (negatief); Oorspronkelijke harde delen; Gepermineraliseerd; Versteend hout; Gerekristalliseerd; Vervanging; Sporenfossiel; Overige
hr-HR: Vrsta očuvanja fosila: Inkluzija u jantaru; Ugljični film; Odljevak (pozitiv); Kompresija; Konkrecija/kvržica; Koprolit; Otisak; Kalup (negativ); Originalni tvrdi dijelovi; Permineralizirano; Okamenjeno drvo; Rekristalizirano; Zamjena; Fosilni trag; Ostalo
tr: Fosil koruma türü: Kehribar kalıntısı; Karbon film; Kalıp (pozitif); Sıkıştırma; Konkresyon/nodül; Koprolit; İz; Kalıp (negatif); Orijinal sert kısımlar; Permineralize; Taşlaşmış ağaç; Yeniden kristalleşmiş; Yer değiştirme; İz fosili; Diğer
da: Bevaringstype for fossil: Indkapslet i rav; Kulstoffilm; Afstøbning (positiv); Kompression; Konkretion/nodul; Koprolit; Aftryk; Form (negativ); Oprindelige hårde dele; Permineraliseret; Forstenet træ; Omkrystalliseret; Erstatning; Sporfossil; Andet
pt-PT: Tipo de preservação dos fósseis: Inclusão em âmbar; Película de carbono; Molde (positivo); Compressão; Concreção/nódulo; Coprólito; Impressão; Molde (negativo); Partes duras originais; Permineralizado; Madeira petrificada; Recristalizado; Substituição; Icnofóssil; Outro
ro-RO: Tipul de conservare a fosilelor: Incluziune în chihlimbar; Film de carbon; Mulaj (pozitiv); Compresiune; Concrețiune/nodul; Coprolit; Amprentă; Matriță (negativ); Părți dure originale; Permineralizat; Lemn pietrificat; Recristalizat; Înlocuire; Urmă fosilă; Altele
sv: Fossil bevarandetyp: Innesluten i bärnsten; Kolfilm; Avgjutning (positiv); Komprimering; Konkretion/nodul; Koprolit; Avtryck; Form (negativ); Ursprungliga hårda delar; Permineraliserad; Förstenat trä; Omkristalliserad; Ersättning; Spårfossil; Övrigt
lt-LT: Fosilijos išsilaikymo tipas: Gintaro inkliuzas; Anglies plėvelė; Liejinys (pozityvas); Suspaudimas; Konkrecija / gumbukas; Koprolitas; Atspaudas; Forma (negatyvas); Originalios kietosios dalys; Permineralizuotas; Suakmenėjusi mediena; Rekristalizuotas; Pakeitimas; Pėdsakų fosilija; Kita
en: Fossil preservation type: Amber inclusion; Carbon film; Cast (positive); Compression; Concretion/nodule; Coprolite; Impression; Mold (negative); Original hard parts; Permineralized; Petrified wood; Recrystallized; Replacement; Trace fossil; Other
ja: 化石の保存タイプ: 琥珀内包物; 炭化化石; キャスト (凸型); 圧縮; コンクリーション/ノジュール; 糞石; 印象化石; モールド (凹型); 生体硬組織; 鉱化石; 珪化木; 再結晶化石; 置換化石; 生痕化石; その他
vi: Loại bảo tồn hóa thạch: Hóa thạch trong hổ phách; Màng carbon; Khuôn đúc (dương bản); Nén; Kết hạch/vết sần; Phân hóa thạch; Dấu in; Khuôn đúc (âm bản); Phần cứng nguyên bản; Thấm khoáng; Gỗ hóa thạch; Tái kết tinh; Thay thế; Dấu vết hóa thạch; Khác
cs: Typ fosilní konzervace: Inkluze v jantaru; Uhlíkový film; Odlitek (pozitiv); Komprese; Konkrece/nodule; Koprolit; Otisk; Forma (negativ); Původní tvrdé části; Permineralizovaná; Zkamenělé dřevo; Rekrystalizovaná; Zastoupená (náhrada minerálu); Ichnofosilie (stopa); Jiné
el: Τύπος διατήρησης απολιθώματος: Εγκλεισμός σε κεχριμπάρι; Φιλμ άνθρακα; Εκμαγείο (θετικό); Συμπίεση; Συμπύκνωμα/οζίδιο; Κοπρόλιθος; Αποτύπωμα; Καλούπι (αρνητικό); Αρχικά σκληρά μέρη; Εμποτισμένο με ορυκτά; Απολιθωμένο ξύλο; Ανακρυσταλλωμένο; Αντικατάσταση; Ιχνοαπολίθωμα; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ konzervácie fosílií: Inklúzia v jantári; Uhlíkový film; Odliatok (pozitív); Kompresia; Konkrécia/hľuza; Koprolit; Odtlačok; Forma (negatív); Pôvodné tvrdé časti; Permineralizované; Skamenené drevo; Rekryštalizované; Nahradenie; Stopová fosília; Iné
th: ประเภทการเก็บรักษาฟอสซิล: ฟอสซิลในอำพัน; รอยพิมพ์คาร์บอน; รูปหล่อ (นูน); รอยอัด; มวลพอก/ก้อนแร่; มูลสัตว์กลายเป็นหิน; รอยประทับ; รอยพิมพ์ (ลบ); ชิ้นส่วนแข็งดั้งเดิม; เพอร์มิเนอรัลไลซ์; ไม้กลายเป็นหิน; ตกผลึกใหม่; การแทนที่; ร่องรอยฟอสซิล; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 化石保存类型: 琥珀内含物; 碳化膜; 铸型（正模）; 压缩; 结核/结核石; 粪化石; 印痕; 模铸（负模）; 原始硬体部分; 矿化; 硅化木; 重结晶; 置换; 遗迹化石; 其他
zh-TW: 化石保存類型: 琥珀包裹體; 碳化薄膜; 鑄模 (陽模); 壓痕; 結核; 糞化石; 印痕; 鑄模 (陰模); 原始硬體; 礦化; 矽化木; 再結晶; 置換; 生痕化石; 其他
ko: 화석 보존 유형: 호박 내포물; 탄소 피막; 캐스트(양각); 압축; 단괴/결핵체; 분화석; 인흔 화석; 몰드(음각); 원래 경질부; 과광물화; 규화목; 재결정화; 치환; 생흔 화석; 기타
de: Art der Fossilerhaltung: Inkluse in Bernstein; Kohlenstofffilm; Abguss (positiv); Kompression; Konkretion/Knolle; Koprolith; Abdruck; Abdruck (negativ); Originale Hartteile; Permineralisiert; Versteinertes Holz; Rekristallisiert; Ersatz; Spurenfossil; Sonstiges
es: Tipo de conservación del fósil: Inclusión en ámbar; Película de carbono; Molde (positivo); Compresión; Concreción/nódulo; Coprolito; Impresión; Molde (negativo); Partes duras originales; Permineralizado; Madera petrificada; Recristalizado; Reemplazo; Fósil traza; Otro
pt-BR: Tipo de preservação de fósseis: Inclusão em âmbar; Filme de carbono; Molde (positivo); Compressão; Concreção/nódulo; Coprólito; Impressão; Molde (negativo); Partes duras originais; Permineralizado; Madeira petrificada; Recristalizado; Substituição; Icnofóssil (traço fóssil); Outro
bg-BG: Тип фосилизация: Инклузия в кехлибар; Въглероден отпечатък; Отливка (позитив); Компресия; Конкреция/нодул; Копролит; Отпечатък; Матрица (негатив); Оригинални твърди части; Перминерализиран; Вкаменено дърво; Рекристализиран; Заместване; Изкопаема следа; Друго
it: Tipo di conservazione dei fossili: Inclusione in ambra; Pellicola di carbonio; Calco (positivo); Compressione; Concrezione/nodulo; Coprolite; Impronta; Stampo (negativo); Parti dure originali; Permineralizzato; Legno pietrificato; Ricristallizzato; Sostituzione; Icnofossile; Altro
nb: Fossil bevaringstype: Innesluttet i rav; Karbonfilm; Avstøpning (positiv); Kompresjon; Konkresjon/nodul; Koprolitt; Avtrykk; Avtrykk (negativt); Opprinnelige harde deler; Permineralisert; Forsteinet tre; Rekrystallisert; Erstatning; Sporfossil; Annet
pl: Typ konserwacji skamieniałości: Inkluzja w bursztynie; Zwęglenie; Odlew (pozytyw); Odcisk; Konkrecja/bula; Koprolit; Odcisk; Odcisk (negatyw); Oryginalne części twarde; Permineralizacja; Skamieniałe drewno; Rekrystalizacja; Zastąpienie (wymiana); Ślad kopalny; Inny
fi: Fossiilien säilytystyyppi: Meripihkasulkeuma; Hiilikalvo; Valos (positiivinen); Puristuma; Konkreetio/noduli; Koproliitti; Painanne; Muotti (negatiivinen); Alkuperäiset kovat osat; Permineralisoitunut; Kivettynyt puu; Uudelleenkiteytynyt; Korvautuma; Jälkifossiili; Muu